Hawaii statutes.
[§453-8.4] Summary suspension.
(a) The board may summarily suspend any license issued under this chapter upon
a specific determination that the failure to take such an action may result in
an immediate and unreasonable threat to personal safety or of fraud that
jeopardizes or endangers the health or safety of patients as determined by the
professional standards of care upon consumers, and that, for the protection of
the public from the possible consequences of such practices, the license should
be immediately suspended or restricted.

(b) The order of summary suspension shall include
a brief statement of findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall be served
upon the licensee as required by chapter 91. The order of summary suspension
shall be effective upon service.

(c) A licensee served with an order of summary
suspension shall have the right to request a hearing to show cause why the
order of summary suspension should be terminated. Any request for a hearing
shall be made in writing and filed with the board within five business days of
service of the order. The board shall hold a hearing within seven business
days of receipt of the licensee's request for the hearing to show cause.

(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
an order summarily suspending a license issued under this chapter shall remain
in effect until the effective date of a final decision and order issued by the
board in a disciplinary action or the effective date of an order issued by the
board terminating the summary suspension following a hearing to show cause,
whichever occurs first, but in either case shall not exceed thirty business
days.

(e) The board shall conduct a
hearing for disciplinary action against a licensee whose license has been
summarily suspended under this section within twenty business days from the
effective date of the order of summary suspension.

(f) Any attempt by the licensee to continue
the practice of medicine or the practice of medicine by the licensee while the
license has been summarily suspended shall be grounds for revocation of the
license and shall subject the licensee to any penalties prescribed under this
chapter, the applicable licensing laws, or any rule or order of the board. [L
2013, c 219, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next